Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-3009] Patents, copyrights, and other
rights. Any patents, copyrights, inventions, discoveries, or other rights
arising from research corporation activities shall belong to the research
corporation and shall be subject to such policies or rules as the board of
directors may adopt. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next